Washington statutes.
RCW 13.24.035

Governor authorized and directed to execute supplementary compact—Contents.

(1) The governor is hereby authorized and directed to execute a compact amending and supplementing the interstate compact on juveniles on behalf of this state with any other state or states legally joining therein in the form substantially as set forth in subsection (2) of this section.

(2)(a) All provisions and procedures of Articles V and VI of the interstate compact on juveniles shall be construed to apply to any juvenile charged with being a delinquent by reason of a violation of any criminal law. Any juvenile charged with being a delinquent by reason of violating any criminal law, shall be returned to the requesting state upon a requisition to the state where the juvenile may be found. A petition in such case shall be filed in a court of competent jurisdiction in the requesting state where the violation of criminal law is alleged to have been committed. The petition may be filed regardless of whether the juvenile has left the state before or after the filing of the petition. The requisition described in Article V of the compact shall be forwarded by the judge of the court in which the petition has been filed.

(b) This amendment provides additional remedies and shall be binding only as among and between those party states which substantially execute the same.

[ 1979 c 155 s 36.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1979 c 155: See notes following RCW 13.04.011.